ja: ペダルの極性: NC; NO; その他
nb: Pedalpolaritet: NC; NO; Annet
de: Pedalpolarität: NC; NO; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Polaridade do pedal: NC; NO; Outro
zh-TW: 踏板極性: NC; NC; 其他
sk-SK: Polarita pedálov: NC; NIE; Iné
ko: 페달 극성: NC; NO; 기타
ro-RO: Polaritatea pedalei: NC; NO; Altele
th: ขั้วแป้นเหยียบ: NC; NO; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Поляритет на педала: NC; НЕ; Други
hu: Pedál polaritása: NC; NO; Egyéb
zh-CN: 踏板极性: NC; NO; 其他
sv: Pedalpolaritet: NC; NEJ; Övrigt
da: Pedalpolaritet: NC; NO; Andet
fi: Pedaalin napaisuus: NC; NO; Muu
hr-HR: Polaritet pedale: NC; NO; Ostalo
ru: Полярность педали: NC; NO; Другая
pt-PT: Polaridade do pedal: NC; NO; Outro
cs: Polarita pedálu: NC; NO; Jiné
lt-LT: Pedalo poliškumas: NC; NO; Kita
tr: Pedal polaritesi: NC; HAYIR; Diğer
es: Polaridad del pedal: NC; NO; Otros
fr: Polarité de la pédale: NC; NO; Autre
it: Polarità del pedale: NC; NO; Altro
el: Πόλωση πεταλιού: NC; NO; Άλλο
nl: Pedaalpolariteit: NC; NO; Andere
en: Pedal polarity: NC; NO; Other
sl-SI: Polariteta pedala: NC; NO; Drugo
pl: Polaryzacja pedału: NC; NO; Inne
vi: Bàn đạp phân cực: NC; NO; Khác